Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Administration.

Administrative Code. —

For board of dispensing opticians, see 12 AAC 30.

Secs. 08.71.010, 08.71.020.
Creation of board; membership. [Repealed, § 4 ch 19 and § 56 ch 40 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 08.71.030.
Qualifications of board members. [Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 08.71.040.
Election of officers. [Repealed, § 4 ch 19 and § 56 ch 40 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 08.71.045.
Removal of board members. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.020.]

Sec. 08.71.050.
Board regulations. [Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 08.71.055.
Powers and duties.

The department shall have the following powers and duties:

to issue licenses to applicants;

to renew licenses;

to hold hearings and order disciplinary sanctions against a person who violates this chapter or the regulations of the department;

to supply forms for applications, licenses, and other needed documents;

to keep a record of all proceedings open to the public, including the name of each license applicant and each licensee;

to approve nonprofit organizations for the distribution and fitting of used eyeglasses;

to enforce the provisions of this chapter and adopt or amend regulations necessary to make these provisions effective.

History.

(§ 3 ch 56 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 58 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensing, see 12 AAC 30, art. 2.

For continuing competence, see 12 AAC 30, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, effective July 18, 2008, substituted “department” for “board” in the introductory language and in paragraph (3), inserted paragraph (6), and made related changes.

The second 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, substituted “department” for “board” in the introductory language and in paragraph (3).

Secs. 08.71.060 — 08.71.070.
Record of proceedings; applicability of Administrative Procedure Act. [Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 1980.]